District of Columbia statutes.
7-1131.15

Approval of Medicaid State Plan Amendment.

(a)

The Department shall have authority to request the Medical Assistance Administration to seek the approval of the federal Health Care Financing Administration for the amendment to the District of Columbia Medicaid State Plan to add Medicaid rehabilitation services, which was submitted to the Health Care Financing Administration on September 30, 2000.

(b)

The Department shall have the authority to request that the Medical Assistance Administration (“MAA”) seek the approval of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for an amendment to the Medicaid State Plan that will provide for a per diem reimbursement for inpatient psychiatric treatment for cases where the authorized length of stay exceeds 7 days and the Diagnostic Related Group reimbursement does not exceed the per diem reimbursement schedule for Medicaid-eligible involuntary, emergency psychiatric admissions. The MAA shall submit the amendment to the Medicaid State Plan to the Council for approval by resolution within 30 days of receipt of approval of the amendment from the federal government.

Dec. 18, 2001, D.C. Law 14-56, § 115, 48 DCR 7674
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 5122, 52 DCR 7503
D.C. Law 16-33 designated the existing text as subsec. (a); and added subsec. (b).

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 15 of Department of Mental Health Establishment Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-51, October 30, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 10807).

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 15 of Department of Mental Health Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-55, May 2, 2001, 48 DCR 4390).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 15 of Department of Mental Health Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-101, July 23, 2001, 48 DCR 7123).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 115 of Mental Health Service Delivery Reform Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-144, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 9947).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5122 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
Short title of subtitle L of title V of Law 16-33: Section 5121 of D.C. Law 16-33 provided that subtitle L of title V of the act may be cited as Department of Mental Health Acute Care Initiative Act of 2005.